Louisiana, session 2026, HB357.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1034.2(A) and (C)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 23:1034.2(C)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1034.2. Reimbursement schedule
A. The assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation
administration shall establish and promulgate a reimbursement schedule for drugs,
supplies, hospital care and services, medical and surgical treatment, and any
nonmedical treatment recognized by the laws of this state as legal and due under the
Workers' Compensation Act pursuant to this Chapter and applicable to any person
or corporation who renders such care, services, or treatment or provides such drugs
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1103 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 357
or supplies to any person covered by this Chapter 10 of Title 23 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
C.(1) The reimbursement schedule shall include charges limited to the mean
of the usual and customary charges for such care, services, treatment, drugs, and
supplies be reasonable when compared to the workers' compensation reimbursement
schedule and have similar characteristics of surrounding states. Any necessary
adjustments to the reimbursement schedule adopted and established in accordance
with the provisions of this Section may shall be made annually and supported by data
and information provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. The assistant secretary
shall promulgate the initial reimbursement schedule.
(2) The assistant secretary shall have the authority to collect the information
and data necessary to calculate the reimbursement schedule. do all of the following:
(a) Examine potential administrative and procedural relief for healthcare
providers to ensure expedited care and payment.
(b) Examine potential processes for paperwork reductions for healthcare
providers.
(c) Examine potential processes to expand medical markets for more access
to patient care.
(d) Include and consider any and all additional external stakeholders and
partners in calculating the reimbursement schedule.
(e) Collect information and data necessary to calculate the reimbursement
schedule. The collection of information and data shall be governed by the following
guidelines:
(a) (i) The assistant secretary shall create a written survey detailing the
information requested.
(b) (ii) The survey shall be managed by the office of workers' compensation
administration in conjunction with an academic institution.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1103 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 357
(c) (iii) The information requested shall be based upon data at least six
months old.
(d) (iv) There shall be a minimum of thirty health care providers reporting
data upon which each disseminated statistic is based.
(e) (v) No individual health care healthcare provider's data shall represent
more than twenty-five percent on a weighted basis of each statistic.
(f) (vi) Any information disseminated shall be sufficiently aggregated such
that it will not allow recipients to identify the prices charged or compensation paid
by any particular health care provider.
* * *
(5) The office of workers' compensation administration shall report quarterly
to the House and Senate committees on labor and industrial relations regarding the
rate study and process and the committees shall have legislative oversight over the
process.
* * *
Section 2. The initial reimbursement schedule required by the provisions of R.S.
23:1034.2(C) as amended and reenacted by Section 1 of this Act shall be promulgated and
take effect on January 1, 2027.